Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13A Administrative Regulations
13A.2251.
Information required in administrative regulation when incorporating material by reference.

An administrative body shall incorporate material by reference in the last section of an administrative regulation. This section shall include:

The title of the material incorporated by reference placed in quotation marks, followed by the edition date of the material;

Information on how the material may be obtained; and

A statement that the material is available for public inspection and copying, subject to copyright law, at the main, regional, or branch offices of the administrative body, and the address and office hours of each. Following the required statement, the administrative body shall include information that states the administrative body’s Web site address or telephone number or that provides contact information for other sources that may have the material available to the public.

The section incorporating material by reference shall be titled “Incorporation by Reference”.

If only one (1) item is incorporated by reference, the first subsection of the section incorporating material by reference shall contain the following statement: “(name and edition date of material incorporated) is incorporated by reference.”

If more than one (1) item is incorporated by reference, the first subsection of the section incorporating material by reference shall contain the following statement: “The following material is incorporated by reference: (a) (name and edition date of first item incorporated); and (b) (name and edition date of second item incorporated).”

The second subsection of the section incorporating material by reference shall include the following statement: “This material may be inspected, copied, or obtained, subject to applicable copyright law, at (name of administrative body, full address), Monday through Friday, (state the regular office hours).”

A summary of the incorporated material, in detail sufficient to identify the subject matter to which it pertains, shall be attached to an administrative regulation that incorporates material by reference. This summary shall include:

Relevant programs, statutes, funds, rights, duties, and procedures affected by the material and the manner in which they are affected;

A citation of the specific state or federal statutes or regulations authorizing or requiring the procedure or policy found in the material incorporated by reference; and

The total number of pages incorporated by reference.

One (1) copy of the material incorporated by reference shall be filed with the regulations compiler when the administrative regulation is filed.
(4) (a) 1. One (1) copy of the material incorporated by reference shall be filed with the regulations compiler when the administrative regulation is filed.

For material incorporated by reference that was developed by the promulgating administrative body:

The material incorporated by reference shall be prominently displayed on the administrative body’s Web site; and

The Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address where the material may be directly viewed on the agency’s Web site shall be included in the body of the administrative regulation.

For materials incorporated by reference that are subject to a valid copyright owned by a third party not controlled by the promulgating administrative body, the material shall be referenced by providing sufficient information to assist in locating the material from the third party.

Material incorporated by reference shall be placed in a binder, attached to the back of the administrative regulation, or filed on a CD-ROM or DVD.

If the material is placed in a binder, the administrative body shall indicate, on the front binder cover and on the first page of the material incorporated by reference, the:

Number of the administrative regulation to which the material incorporated by reference pertains;

Date on which it is filed; and

Citation of each item that is included in the binder.

The material incorporated by reference may be attached to the back of the administrative regulation if it is:

No more than four (4) pages in length; and

Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8 1/2) by eleven (11) inches, and single-sided.

The material incorporated by reference may be filed on a CD-ROM or DVD disc if the material is saved in Adobe Portable Document Format (PDF). The administrative body shall indicate on the disc and the disc’s storage case the:

Number of the administrative regulation to which the material incorporated by reference pertains;

Date on which it is filed; and

Citation of each item that is included on the disc.

If the same material is incorporated by reference in more than one (1) administrative regulation, an administrative body may file one (1) copy of the material in a binder or on a CD-ROM or DVD disc. The numbers of the administrative regulations in which the material is incorporated by reference shall be indicated with the other information as required by paragraph (b) of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 82, § 18, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 6, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.2255.
Amendment of material previously incorporated by reference.

When an administrative body amends material that had been previously incorporated by reference, the amendment shall be accomplished by submission of:

An amendment to the administrative regulation with a new edition date for the material incorporated by reference. The amendment shall be filed in accordance with:

KRS

13A.220

to initiate a change in an existing administrative regulation;

KRS

13A.280

to amend a proposed administrative regulation as a result of the hearing or written comments received; or

KRS

13A.320

to amend a proposed administrative regulation at a legislative committee meeting;

An entire new document in which the amendments have been made but are not reflected in the manner specified in KRS 13A.222(2).

If the new document has been developed by the promulgating administrative body, the entire document shall be displayed prominently on the administrative body’s Web site and the Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address where the material may be directly viewed on the agency’s Web site shall be included in the body of the administrative regulation.

If any materials incorporated by reference are subject to a valid copyright owned by a third party not controlled by the promulgating administrative body, the material shall be referenced by providing sufficient information to assist in locating the material from the third party;

A detailed summary of the changes and their effect. This summary shall:

Describe changes that are being made in the material incorporated by reference, in sufficient detail that a person reading the summary will know the differences between the material previously incorporated by reference and the new material; or

List each change in the manner required by KRS

13A.320

(2)(c) and (d); and

Be attached to the back of the administrative regulation or, if part of an amendment pursuant to KRS 13A.320, to the amendment submitted for the legislative committee meeting; and

The page or pages of any document developed by the promulgating administrative body in which changes have been made, with the changes accomplished in the manner specified in KRS 13A.222(2). Notwithstanding KRS 13A.040(6), the regulations compiler shall not be required to keep these marked copies once the administrative regulation has been adopted or withdrawn.

If the changes to the material incorporated by reference are technical in nature and authorized by KRS 13A.040(10) or

13A.312

, the administrative body may submit to the regulations compiler a copy of the revised material incorporated by reference and a detailed letter explaining what changes are made and the reason for the changes.

If the regulations compiler determines that the requested change does not affect the substance of the material incorporated by reference and that the change is authorized by KRS 13A.040(10) or

13A.312

, the edition date stated in the administrative regulation shall be changed to match the edition date on the revised material and the history line of that administrative regulation shall note that a technical amendment was made.

If the requested change affects the substance of the material incorporated by reference or is not authorized by KRS 13A.040(10) or 13A.312, the administrative body shall comply with subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 406, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 10, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 7, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 19, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 7, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.2261.
Federal statutes and regulations not to be incorporated by reference.

Federal statutes and regulations shall not be incorporated by reference. If applicable, they shall be cited in the “RELATES TO” and “STATUTORY AUTHORITY” references in a proposed administrative regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 100, § 11, effective June 20, 2005.

13A.2264.
Incorporation by reference of federal regulation — Prohibitions. [Repealed.]

13A.2267.
Certain federal regulations prohibited from incorporation — Procedure for submission of federal regulations. [Repealed.]

13A.230.
Other material to be filed with and e-mailed to compiler.

The administrative body shall attach the following forms to the back of the original and each copy of an administrative regulation:

Regulatory impact analysis as required by KRS

13A.240

;

Tiering statement as required by KRS

13A.210

;

Fiscal note as required by KRS

13A.250

;

Federal mandate comparison, if applicable, as required by KRS

13A.245

; and

The summaries provided for in KRS

13A.2245

,

13A.2251

, or

13A.2255

, if applicable.

The forms required by subsection (1) of this section shall be obtained from the regulations compiler.

The electronic version of an administrative regulation and the attachments required by subsection (1) of this section shall be sent by e-mail to the regulations compiler in a single document at the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version in accordance with KRS

13A.190

,

13A.220

, or

13A.280

in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 23, effective April 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 89, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 425, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 25, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 89, § 11, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 12, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 8, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 20, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.240.
Regulatory impact analysis.

Every administrative body shall prepare and submit to the Legislative Research Commission an original and five (5) duplicate copies of a regulatory impact analysis for every administrative regulation when it is filed with the Commission. The regulatory impact analysis shall include the following information:

The number of the administrative regulation;

The name, e-mail address, and telephone number of the contact person of the administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if applicable, the name, e-mail address, and telephone number of an alternate person to be contacted with specific questions about the regulatory impact analysis;

A brief narrative summary of:

What the administrative regulation does;

The necessity of the administrative regulation;

How the administrative regulation conforms to the content of the authorizing statutes; and

How the administrative regulation currently assists or will assist in the effective administration of the statutes;

If this is an amendment to an existing administrative regulation, a brief narrative summary of:

How the amendment will change the existing administrative regulation;

The necessity of the amendment to the administrative regulation;

How the amendment conforms to the content of the authorizing statutes; and

How the amendment to the administrative regulation will assist in the effective administration of the statutes;

The type and number of individuals, businesses, organizations, or state and local governments affected by the administrative regulation;

An analysis of how the entities referenced in paragraph (e) of this subsection will be impacted by either the implementation of this administrative regulation, if new, or by the change if it is an amendment to an existing administrative regulation. The analysis shall include but not be limited to:

A detailed explanation of the actions the entities referenced in paragraph (e) of this subsection will be required to undertake in order to comply with the proposed administrative regulation;

An estimate of the costs imposed on entities referenced in paragraph (e) of this subsection in order to comply with the proposed administrative regulation; and

The benefits that may accrue to the entities referenced in paragraph (e) of this subsection as a result of compliance;

An estimate of how much it will cost the administrative body to implement this administrative regulation, both initially and on a continuing basis;

The source of the funding to be used for the implementation and enforcement of the administrative regulation;

An assessment of whether an increase in fees or funding will be necessary to implement this administrative regulation or amendment to an existing administrative regulation;

A statement as to whether or not this administrative regulation establishes any fees or directly or indirectly increases any fees; and

The tiering statement required by KRS

13A.210

.

The Legislative Research Commission shall review all regulatory impact analyses submitted by all administrative bodies, and may require any administrative body to submit background data upon which the information required by subsection (1) of this section is based, and an explanation of how the data was gathered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 24, effective April 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 410, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 406, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 13, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 82, § 21, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.245.
Agencies to prepare a federal mandate analysis comparing proposed state regulatory standards to federal standards — Relationship between state administrative regulation and federal law or regulation governing a subject matter.

When promulgating administrative regulations and amending existing administrative regulations in response to a federal mandate, an administrative body shall compare its proposed compliance standards with any minimum or uniform standards suggested or contained in the federal mandate.

Such a comparison shall include, in detail, a written determination by the administrative body on whether the proposed state administrative regulation will impose stricter requirements or other responsibilities on the regulated entities than those required by the federal mandate.

If the administrative body determines that the proposed state administrative regulation imposes additional requirements or responsibilities on the regulated entities than is required by the federal mandate, the administrative body shall include in its comparison analysis a written statement justifying the imposition of stricter standards, requirements, or responsibilities.

Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an administrative regulation shall conform to a federal law or regulation governing a subject matter if an administrative body is:

Not required by federal law or regulation to promulgate an administrative regulation to comply with a federal law or regulation governing the subject matter; and

Required or authorized by state law to promulgate an administrative regulation governing the subject matter.

If the administrative regulation is more stringent than or otherwise differs from the federal law or regulation governing the subject matter, the administrative body shall state in detail in the “NECESSITY, FUNCTION, AND CONFORMITY” paragraph of the administrative regulation the manner in which it is more stringent than or otherwise differs from the federal law or regulation, and the reasons therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 89, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 330, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

13A.250.
Consideration of costs to local and state government and to regulated entities — Fiscal note.

An administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall consider the cost that the administrative regulation may cause state or local government and regulated entities to incur.

A two (2) part cost analysis shall be completed for each administrative regulation.

The first part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost savings to the Commonwealth of Kentucky and each of its affected agencies, and the projected cost or cost savings to affected local governments, including cities, counties, fire departments, and school districts.

The second part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost savings to the regulated entities affected by the administrative regulation.

Agencies or entities affected by the administrative regulation may submit comments in accordance with KRS 13A.270(1) to the promulgating administrative body or to a legislative committee reviewing the administrative regulation.

Each administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall prepare and submit with the administrative regulation a fiscal note. The fiscal note shall state:

The number of the administrative regulation;

The name, e-mail address, and telephone number of the contact person of the administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if applicable, the name, e-mail address, and telephone number of an alternate person to be contacted with specific questions about the fiscal note;

Each unit, part, or division of state or local government the administrative regulation will affect;

In detail, the aspect or service of state or local government to which the administrative regulation relates, including identification of the applicable state or federal statute or regulation that mandates the aspect or service or authorizes the action taken by the administrative regulation;

The estimated effect of the administrative regulation on the expenditures and revenues of a state or local government agency or regulated entity for the first full year the administrative regulation will be in effect. If specific dollar estimates cannot be determined, the administrative body shall provide a brief narrative to explain the fiscal impact of the administrative regulation; and

The conclusion of the promulgating administrative body as to whether the administrative regulation will have a major economic impact, as defined in KRS

13A.010

, to state and local government and regulated entities.

Any administrative body may request the advice and assistance of the Commission in the preparation of the fiscal note.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 25, effective April 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 410, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 89, § 12, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 166, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 197, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 138, § 9, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 22, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 8, effective February 2, 2021; 2022 ch. 207, § 2, effective April 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 207, sec. 2. Under Section 5 of that Act, the Act shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky REINS Act, or the Kentucky Regulations from the Executive in Need of Scrutiny Act.

13A.255.
Notice of ordinary administrative regulation proposing to establish or increase fees.

Within five (5) working days of the filing of an ordinary administrative regulation that proposes to establish or increase fees, except those fees exempted by KRS 13A.100(3), an administrative body shall mail or e-mail a notice containing the information required by subsection (2) of this section, to each state association, organization, or other body representing a person or entity affected by the administrative regulation.

The notice shall include the following information:

The name of the administrative body that filed the proposed administrative regulation;

A statement that the administrative body has promulgated an administrative regulation that establishes or increases fees;

A summary of the administrative regulation that includes:

The amount of each fee being established;

The amount of any increases to any fees previously established; and

The necessity for the establishment or increase in the fees;

A statement that a person or entity may contact the administrative body for additional information;

The time, date, and place of the scheduled public hearing;

The deadline for submitting written comments as established in KRS 13A.270(1)(c); and

The name, mailing address, e-mail address, and telephone number of the contact person for the administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d).

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 406, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 14, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 10, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 23, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.260.
Assignment of proposed administrative regulation to a subcommittee for review and consideration. [Repealed.]

13A.270.
Public hearing and comments — Notice — Communication by e-mail regarding administrative regulations — When notification of regulations compiler required.

In addition to the public comment period required by paragraph (c) of this subsection, following publication in the Administrative Register of the text of an administrative regulation, the administrative body shall, unless authorized to cancel the hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, hold a hearing, open to the public, on the administrative regulation.

The public hearing for an:

Ordinary administrative regulation shall not be held before the twenty-first day or after the last workday of the month following the month in which the administrative regulation is published in the Administrative Register; or

Emergency administrative regulation shall not be held before the twenty-first day or after the last workday of the month in which the administrative regulation is published in the Administrative Register.

Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude the administrative body from holding additional public hearings in addition to the hearing mandated in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph.

The administrative body shall accept written comments regarding the administrative regulation during the comment period. The comment period shall begin on the date the administrative regulation is filed with the regulations compiler and:

For an ordinary administrative regulation, shall run until 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the calendar month following the month in which the administrative regulation was published in the Administrative Register; or

For an emergency administrative regulation, shall run until 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the calendar month in which the administrative regulation is published in the Administrative Register.

Each administrative regulation shall state:

The place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing;

The manner in which interested persons shall submit their:

Notification of attending the public hearing; and

Written comments;

That notification of attending the public hearing shall be transmitted to the administrative body no later than five (5) workdays prior to the date of the scheduled public hearing;

The deadline for submitting written comments regarding the administrative regulation in accordance with subsection (1)(c) of this section; and

The name, position, mailing address, e-mail address, and telephone and facsimile numbers of the person to whom a notification and written comments shall be transmitted.

A person who wishes to be notified that an administrative body has filed an administrative regulation shall:

Contact the administrative body by telephone or written letter to request that the administrative body send the information required by paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection to the person; or

Complete an electronic registration form located on a centralized state government Web site developed and maintained by the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

A registration submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:

Indicate whether the person wishes to receive notification regarding:

All administrative regulations promulgated by an administrative body; or

Each administrative regulation that relates to a specified subject area. The subject areas shall be provided by the administrative bodies and shall be listed on the centralized state government Web site in alphabetical order;

Include a request for the person to provide an e-mail address in order to receive regulatory information electronically;

Be valid for a period of four (4) years from the date the registration is submitted, or until the person submits a written request to be removed from the notification list, whichever occurs first; and

Be transmitted to the promulgating administrative body, if the registration was made through the centralized state government Web site. The collected e-mail addresses shall be used solely for the purposes of this subsection and shall not be sold, transferred, or otherwise made available to third parties, other than the promulgating administrative body.

A copy of the administrative regulation as filed, and all attachments required by KRS 13A.230(1), shall be e-mailed:

To every person who has:

Registered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; and

Provided an e-mail address as part of the registration request;

Within five (5) working days after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the Commission; and

With a request from the administrative body that affected individuals, businesses, or other entities submit written comments that identify the anticipated effects of the proposed administrative regulation.

Within five (5) working days after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the Commission, the administrative body shall mail the following information to every person who has registered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection but did not provide an e-mail address:

A cover letter from the administrative body requesting that affected individuals, businesses, or other entities submit written comments that identify the anticipated effects of the proposed administrative regulation;

A copy of the regulatory impact analysis required by KRS

13A.240

completed in detail sufficient to put the individual on notice as to the specific contents of the administrative regulation, including all proposed amendments to the administrative regulation; and

A statement that a copy of the administrative regulation may be obtained from the Commission’s Web site, which can be accessed on-line through public libraries or any computer with Internet access. The Commission’s Web site address shall be included in the statement.

An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was amended after comments in accordance with KRS

13A.280

to persons who have registered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the person requested a copy pursuant to KRS

13A.280

(8).

If small business may be impacted by an administrative regulation, the administrative body shall e-mail a copy of the administrative regulation as filed, and all attachments required by KRS 13A.230(1), to the chief executive officer of the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy within one (1) working day after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the Commission.

The e-mail shall include a request from the administrative body that the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy review the administrative regulation in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and submit its report or comments in accordance with the deadline established in subsection (1)(c) of this section. A copy of the report shall be filed with the regulations compiler.

An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was amended after comments in accordance with KRS

13A.280

to the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy, unless its chief executive officer requested a copy pursuant to KRS

13A.280

(8).

If a local government may be impacted by an administrative regulation, the administrative body shall send, by e-mail if the local government has an e-mail address, a copy of the administrative regulation as filed and all attachments required by KRS 13A.230(1) to each local government in the state within one (1) working day after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the Commission. If the local government does not have an e-mail address, the material shall not be sent.

The e-mail shall include a request from the administrative body that the local government review the administrative regulation in the same manner as would the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy under KRS 11.202(1)(e), and submit its report or comments in accordance with the deadline established in subsection (1)(c) of this section. A copy of the report or comments shall be filed with the regulations compiler.

An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was amended after comments in accordance with KRS

13A.280

to a local government, unless its contact person requested a copy pursuant to KRS

13A.280

(8).

Persons desiring to be heard at the hearing shall notify the administrative body in writing as to their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) workdays before the scheduled date of the hearing.

The administrative body shall immediately notify the regulations compiler by letter if:

No written notice of intent to attend the public hearing is received by the administrative body at least five (5) workdays before the scheduled hearing, and it chooses to cancel the public hearing; and

No written comments have been received by the close of the last day of the public comment period.

Upon receipt from interested persons of their intent to attend a public hearing, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that the public hearing shall be held.
(8) (a) 1. Upon receipt from interested persons of their intent to attend a public hearing, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that the public hearing shall be held.

If the public hearing is held but no comments are received during the hearing, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that the public hearing was held and that no comments were received.

Upon receipt of written comments, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that written comments have been received.

If the notifications required by subsections (7) and (8) of this section are not received by the regulations compiler by close of business on the second workday of the calendar month following the end of the public comment period, the administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee.

The notifications required by subsections (7) and (8) of this section shall be made by letter. The letter may be sent by e-mail if the administrative body uses an electronic signature and letterhead for the e-mailed document.

Every hearing shall be conducted in such a manner as to guarantee each person who wishes to offer comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to do so, whether or not such person has given the notice contemplated by subsection (6) of this section. No transcript need be taken of the hearing, unless a written request for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall have the responsibility of paying for same. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This section shall not preclude an administrative body from making a transcript or making a recording if it so desires.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each administrative regulation. Administrative regulations may be grouped at the convenience of the administrative body for purposes of hearings required by this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 27, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 425; § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 410, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 89, § 13, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 165, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 100, § 15, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 166, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 138, § 11, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 24, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 9, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 185, § 98, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 7 and 185, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in the 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(7/13/2004). In subsection (1)(a) of this statute, a reference to “subsection (5) of this section” has been changed to read “subsection (7) of this section.” When the statute was amended in
2004 Ky. Acts ch. 165, sec. 5, the subsections were renumbered, but the reference to subsection (5) was not changed to conform. The Reviser of Statutes has made the conforming change under the authority of
KRS

7.136

.